Washington statutes.
RCW 43.220.075

Annual meeting—Forum for partner agencies—Work plan.

(1) The director of the department of ecology and the commissioner of public lands shall jointly host an annual meeting with other corps program participants to serve as a forum for the partner agencies to provide guidance and feedback concerning the management and function of the corps.

(2) At a minimum, representatives of the following must be invited to participate at the annual meeting: The department of fish and wildlife; the state parks and recreation commission; the Puget Sound partnership; the department of veterans affairs; the employment security department; the Washington commission for national and community service; conservation districts; the state conservation commission; the salmon recovery funding board; the recreation and conservation office; the department of commerce; the department of health; or any similar successor organizations and any appropriate nonprofit organizations, including those engaged in service corps projects.

(3) Annual meeting participants shall, at a minimum:

(a) Review the conservation corps projects completed in the previous year, including an analysis of successes and opportunities for improvement; and

(b) Establish a work plan for the coming year, including the setting of annual priorities or criteria consistent with this chapter to guide crew development and the development of plans to pursue funding from various sources to expand the conservation corps.

[ 2011 c 20 s 11.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 20: See note following RCW 43.220.020.